Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In independent school districts, the members of the school board shall be elected
from the district at large. In county school districts, members shall be elected from
divisions.
(2) The board of education of each county school district shall[, not later than July 1,
1940,] divide its district into five (5) divisions containing integral voting precincts
and as equal in population insofar as is practicable. In[ first] dividing the county
district into divisions the board shall, if more than one (1) of its members reside in
one (1) division, determine by lot which member from that division shall represent
that division, and which members shall represent the divisions in which no member
resides. The members so determined to represent divisions in which no member
resides shall be considered the members from those divisions until their terms
expire, and thereafter the members from those divisions shall be nominated and
elected as provided in KRS 160.200 and 160.220 to 160.250.
(3) Any changes made in division boundary lines shall be to make divisions as equal in
population and containing integral voting precincts insofar as is practical. No
change may be made in division boundary lines less than five (5) years after the last
change in any division lines, except in case of merger of districts, a change in
territory due to annexation, a district meeting the provisions of subsection (5) of
this section, or to allow compliance with KRS 117.055(2).
(4) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, if one
hundred (100) residents of a county school district division petition the
Kentucky Board of Education stating that the school district divisions are not
divided as nearly equal in population as can reasonably be expected, the chief
state school officer shall cause an investigation to determine the validity of the
Page 1 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
petition, the investigation to be completed within thirty (30) days after receipt
of the petition.
(b) If the investigation reveals the school district to be unequally divided
according to population, the Kentucky Board of Education, upon the
recommendation of the chief state school officer, shall order the local board of
education to make changes in school district divisions as are necessary to
equalize population within the five (5) school divisions.
(c) If any board fails to comply with the order of the Kentucky Board of
Education within thirty (30) days or prior to August 1 in any year in which
any members of the board are to be elected, members shall be elected from
the district at large until the order of the Kentucky Board of Education has
been complied with.
(d) No change shall be made in the boundary of any division under the provisions
of this subsection after August 1 in the year in which a member of the school
board is to be elected from any division.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, in county school
districts having reached an end-of-year enrollment of twenty-five thousand
(25,000) or more students[counties containing a city of the first class wherein a
merger pursuant to KRS 160.041 shall have been accomplished]:
(a) [, ]There shall be:
1. Seven (7) divisions as equal in population as is practicable, with one (1)
member appointed[ members elected] from each of the divisions by the
chief executive officer of the county and confirmed by the legislative
body of the county in accordance with paragraph (c) of this
subsection. The county board of education shall determine the
divisions. To be eligible to be appointed[elected] from a division, a
candidate must reside in that division; and
Page 2 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
2. Four (4) members from the district at large appointed by the chief
executive officer of the county in accordance with paragraph (b) of
this subsection and confirmed by the legislative body of the county in
accordance with paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(b) Appointments to the county board of education under this subsection shall
reflect no less than proportional representation of the two (2) leading
political parties of the Commonwealth based on the county's voter
registration and the political affiliation of each appointee as of December
31 of the year preceding the date of his or her appointment. A particular
political party affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to appointment to the
board generally, however, if any person is appointed to the board who is not
affiliated with either of the two (2) leading political parties of the
Commonwealth, the proportional representation by political party affiliation
requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the total number of
members on the board less any members not affiliated with either of the two
(2) leading political parties;[. The divisions, based upon 1970 United States
Census Bureau Reports on total population by census tracts for Jefferson
County, Kentucky shall be as follows: Division One shall include census
tracts 1-28; Division Two shall include census tracts 29-35, 47-53, 57-74, 80-
84, 93, 129, 130; Division Three shall include census tracts 75-79, 85-88, 98-
106, 107.01, 108; Division Four shall include census tracts 121.01, 123-128;
Division Five shall include census tracts 36-46, 56, 90, 120, 121.02, 122;
Division Six shall include census tracts 54, 55, 91, 92, 94, 95, 110.02, 113,
114, 117.01, 117.02, 118, 119; Division Seven shall include census tracts 89,
96, 97, 107.02, 109, 110.01, 111, 112, 115, 116, 117.03, 131, 132.]
(c) For confirmation of appointments to county boards of education under this
subsection, if the legislative body of the county declines to:
Page 3 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
1. Consider an appointee within ninety (90) calendar days, the position
shall become vacant at that time and the appointee shall not be
reappointed to the county board of education for a period of two (2)
years from that date; and
2. Confirm the appointee, the position shall become vacant upon the date
the legislative body of the county declines to confirm the appointment
and the appointee shall not be reappointed to the county board of
education for a period of two (2) years from that date; and
(d) The terms of the members[ to be elected], KRS 160.044 notwithstanding,
shall be four (4) years[ and the election for the initial four (4) year terms shall
be as follows: The election of the members from Divisions Two, Four and
Seven shall be held at the next regular November election following the
effective date of the merger pursuant to KRS 160.041, and the election of the
members from Divisions One, Three, Five and Six shall be held at the regular
November election two (2) years thereafter].
(6) [In counties containing cities of the first class, ]Responsibility for the establishment
and[or] the changing of county school board division boundaries shall be with the
county[local] board of education, subject to the review and approval of the county
board of elections, or in the case of a county school district having reached an
end-of-year enrollment of twenty-five thousand (25,000) or more students, subject
to the review and approval of the legislative body of the county. Where division
and census tract boundaries do not coincide with existing election precinct
boundaries, school board divisions shall be redrawn to comply with precinct
boundaries. In no instance shall precinct boundaries be redrawn nor shall a precinct
be divided to accommodate the drawing of school board division lines. [Precinct
boundaries nearest existing school board division boundaries shall become the new
division boundary. ]All changes under this section[statute] shall be completed on or
Page 4 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
before[ January 1, 1979, and on or before] January 1 in any[ succeeding] year in
which a member of the[ school] board is to be elected or appointed from any
division. A record of all changes in division lines shall be kept in the offices of the
county board of education[ and the county board of elections]. The board of
education shall publish all changes pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. A copy of the
newspaper in which the notice is published shall be filed with the chief state school
officer within ten (10) days following its publication.
Section 2. KRS 160.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in Sections 1, 2, 4, and 6 of this Act, for counties containing a county
school district having reached an end-of-year enrollment of twenty-five thousand
(25,000) or more students, "chief executive officer" means the:
(a) Mayor of a consolidated local government;
(b) Mayor of an urban-county government; or
(c) County judge/executive of the county for counties not organized under the
forms of government listed in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(2) Each school district shall be under the management and control of a board of
education consisting of five (5) members, except in county school districts having
reached an end-of-year enrollment of twenty-five thousand (25,000) or more
students[counties containing a city of the first class wherein a merger pursuant to
KRS 160.041 shall have been accomplished] which shall have eleven (11)
members, including seven (7) members appointed by the chief executive
officer[elected] from[ the] divisions and four (4) members appointed by the chief
executive officer from the district at large in the manner prescribed by Section 1 of
this Act[KRS 160.210(5)], to be known as the "Board of Education of ....,
Kentucky." Each board of education shall be a body politic and corporate with
perpetual succession. It may sue and be sued; make contracts; expend funds
necessary for liability insurance premiums and for the defense of any civil action
Page 5 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
brought against an individual board member in his or her official or individual
capacity, or both, on account of an act made in the scope and course of his or her
performance of legal duties as a board member; purchase, receive, hold, and sell
property; issue its bonds to build and construct improvements; and do all things
necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it is created. Each board of
education shall elect a chair[chairman] and vice chair[chairman] from its
membership in a manner and for a term prescribed by the board not to exceed two
(2) years.
(3)[(2)] No board of education shall participate in any financing of school buildings,
school improvements, appurtenances thereto, or furnishing and equipment,
including education technology equipment without:
(a) First establishing the cost of the project in advance of financing, based on the
receipt of advertised, public, and competitive bids for such project, in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424; and
(b) Establishing the cost of financing in advance of the sale of any bonds,
certificates of participation in any leases, or other evidences of financial
commitments issued by or on behalf of such board. Any bonds, leases,
participations, or other financial arrangements shall not involve a final
commitment of the board until the purchaser or lender involved shall have
been determined by public advertising in accordance with KRS Chapter 424.
(4)[(3)] No board of education shall make a mortgage, lien, or other encumbrance
upon any school building owned by the board, or transfer title to any such school
building as part of any financing arrangement, without the specific approval of the
Department of Education, and without the transaction being entered into pursuant to
a detailed plan or procedure specifically authorized by Kentucky statute.
(5)[(4)] Without the approval of the Department of Education, no board may lease, as
lessee, a building or public facility that has been or is to be financed at the request
Page 6 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
of the board or on its behalf through the issuance of bonds by another public body
or by a nonprofit corporation serving as an agency and instrumentality of the board,
or by a leasing corporation. Any lease, participation, or other financial arrangement
shall not involve a final commitment of the board unless and until the purchaser or
lender involved in same shall have been determined by public advertising in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424. No transaction shall be entered into by the
board except upon the basis of public advertising and competitive bidding in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424.
(6)[(5)] A school district may issue general obligation bonds in accordance with KRS
Chapter 66.
(7)[(6)] Rental payments due by a board under a lease approved by the Department of
Education in accordance with subsection (5)[(4)] of this section, and debt service
payments under a general obligation bond issued in accordance with this section,
shall be due and payable not less than ten (10) days prior to the interest due date for
the bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued to finance the building or public
facility. If a board fails to make a rental payment when due under a lease or a debt
service payment when due for a general obligation bond issue, upon notification to
the Department of Education by the paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee for the
bonds not less than three (3) days prior to the interest due date, the Department of
Education shall withhold or intercept any funds then due the board to the extent of
the amount of the required payment on the bonds and remit the amount to the
paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee as appropriate. Thereafter, the Department
of Education shall resolve the matter with the board and adjust remittances to the
board to the extent of the amount paid by the Department of Education on the
board's behalf.
(8)[(7)] Bonds, notes, or leases negotiated to provide education technology shall not
be sold for longer than seven (7) years or the useful life of the equipment as
Page 7 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
established by the state technology master plan, whichever is less.
(9)[(8)] Notwithstanding any requirements of public advertising, competitive bidding,
or approval by the Department of Education, or any administrative regulation
promulgated pursuant to KRS 156.160(1)(o), a local board may authorize the
transfer or sale of the district's real or personal property to another governmental or
quasi-governmental agency in exchange for money or a similar type of property that
equals or exceeds the fair market value of the district property as determined by an
independent appraisal conducted by:
(a) An individual or organization not affiliated with the district or its officers or
employees, using a generally accepted national or professional standard; or
(b) A district's officers or employees using a nationally published valuation of
property based on the most recent edition of the publication.
Section 3. KRS 160.170 is amended to read as follows:
Every person elected or appointed to a board of education shall, before assuming the
duties of the office, take the following oath, in addition to the constitutional oath:
"State of Kentucky,
"County of _________
"_______________, being duly sworn, says that he or she is eligible under the law
to serve as a member of the board of education, and that he or she will, while serving as a
member of such board, carry out all duties prescribed by law and remain eligible for
membership on the board of education.
"_______________________
"Subscribed and sworn to before me this _____ day of ____________
"_______________________"
The oath shall be kept on record by the board.
Section 4. KRS 160.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any vacancy in any
Page 8 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
board of education shall be filled by a majority vote of the remaining
members of the local board within sixty (60) days after the vacancy occurs.
Within thirty (30) days of the vacancy, the local board shall, for two (2)
weeks, have solicited applications by posting a notice announcing the vacancy
on the district's website and by placing an advertisement in the newspaper of
the largest general circulation in the county. An applicant shall file a letter of
intent with the local board affirming that the applicant meets the eligibility
requirements as established by KRS 160.180 and shall submit with the
application a transcript evidencing completion of the twelfth grade or results
of a twelfth grade equivalency examination. After the two (2) weeks of
advertisement on the district's website and in the newspaper, the local board
shall select from the applicants under this subsection to fill the vacancy.
(b) In county school districts having reached an end-of-year enrollment of
twenty-five thousand (25,000) or more students, any vacancy in the county
board of education shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term
by the chief executive officer of the county within sixty (60) days after the
vacancy occurs and in accordance with subsection (5) of Section 1 of this
Act.
(2) If the local board or chief executive officer, as applicable, fails to make an
appointment under subsection (1) of this section, then the chief state school officer
shall fill the vacancy within sixty (60) days of the failure.
(3) The member appointed[chosen] under this section shall meet the eligibility
requirements as established by KRS 160.180 and shall hold office until his or her
successor is elected or appointed, and has qualified.
(4) Any vacancy of an elected position having an unexpired term of one (1) year or
more on August 1 after the vacancy occurs shall be filled for the unexpired term by
an election to be held at the next regular election after the vacancy occurs. The
Page 9 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
elected member shall succeed the member chosen under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section to fill the vacancy. Nominating petitions shall be filed with the county clerk
not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the day for holding the
regular election for the unexpired term. Declarations of intent to be a write-in
candidate shall be filed with the county clerk in accordance with KRS 117.265.
(5) (a) If no candidate files a petition of nomination or declaration of intent to be a
write-in candidate to fill an unexpired term on a local board of education
under subsection (4) of this section, then a new vacancy shall exist on
November 1 and the vacancy shall be filled according to subsection (1) of this
section.
(b) If no candidate files a petition of nomination or declaration of intent to be a
write-in candidate for a new term on a local board of education opening
pursuant to KRS 118.315 and 118.365, then a vacancy shall exist on January 1
and the vacancy shall be filled according to subsection (1) of this section.
Section 5. KRS 160.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband,
wife, son, and daughter.
(2) A person shall only be eligible for membership on a board of education if the
person:
(a) Has attained the age of twenty-four (24) years;
(b) Has been a citizen of Kentucky for at least three (3) years preceding the
election and is a voter of the district for which he or she is elected;
(c) Has completed at least the twelfth grade or has been issued a High School
Equivalency Diploma, as evidenced by:
1. An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury certifying completion of the
twelfth grade or the equivalent that has been filed with the nominating
petition required by KRS 118.315; or
Page 10 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
2. A transcript evidencing completion of the twelfth grade or the results of
a twelfth grade equivalency examination that has been filed with the
nominating petition required by KRS 118.315;
(d) Does not hold any elective federal, state, county, or city office;
(e) Is not, at the time of his or her election or appointment, directly or indirectly
interested in the sale to the board of books, stationery, or any other property,
materials, supplies, equipment, or services for which school funds are
expended;
(f) Has not been removed from membership on a board of education for cause;
and
(g) Does not have a relative employed by the school district, in the case of a
person elected or appointed after July 13, 1990. This shall not apply to a
board member holding office on July 13, 1990, whose relative was not
initially hired by the district during the tenure of the board member.
(3) (a) An elected[A] member of a board of education shall be subject to removal
from office pursuant to KRS 415.050 and 415.060, and an appointed member
shall be subject to removal from office pursuant to subsection (2) of Section
6 of this Act, if[,] after the election or appointment the member:
1. Becomes interested in any contract with or claims against the board, of
the kind mentioned in subsection (2)(e) of this section;
2. Moves his or her residence from the division for which he or she was
chosen;
3. Attempts to influence the employment of any school employee, except
the superintendent or school board attorney;
4. Is convicted of a felony;
5. Performs acts of malfeasance in performance of duties prescribed by
law;
Page 11 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
6. Willfully misuses, converts, or misappropriates public property or funds;
or
7. Does anything that would render the member ineligible for reelection or
reappointment.
(b) In accordance with KRS 7.410, the Office of Education Accountability shall
have the duty and responsibility to investigate current local board of education
members for allegations of conduct prohibited by paragraph (a) of this
subsection. After review and investigation, the Office of Education
Accountability shall refer appropriate matters to the Attorney General.
(4) A member of a board of education shall be eligible for reelection or reappointment
unless he or she becomes disqualified.
(5) The annual in-service training requirements for all members of boards of education
serving[in office] as of December 31, 2014, shall be as follows:
(a) Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to three (3) years of experience;
(b) Eight (8) hours for members with four (4) to seven (7) years of experience;
and
(c) Four (4) hours for members with eight (8) or more years of experience.
The Kentucky Board of Education shall identify the criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
(6) (a) For all members of boards of education who begin their initial service on or
after January 1, 2015, the in-service training requirements shall be:
1. Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training within
the first twelve (12) months of initial service and at least once
every four (4) years thereafter; and
Page 12 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
2. Eight (8) hours for members with more than eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training at least
once every four (4) years.
(b) Training topics for members under this subsection with less than two (2) years
of consecutive service shall include three (3) hours of finance and one (1)
hour of superintendent evaluation within the first two (2) years of service. The
Kentucky Board of Education shall identify criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
Section 6. KRS 156.132 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) As used in this subsection[section], except in paragraph (b) of this
subsection[ (1)], "public school officer" means a person who previously
served as a superintendent of schools or as an appointed member of a county
board of education during which time charges were brought against him or
her under this section.
(b)[(1)] The chief state school officer shall recommend, by written charges to the
proper school authorities having immediate jurisdiction, the removal of any
superintendent of schools, principal, teacher, member of a school council,
appointed member of a county board of education, or other public school
officer as to whom he or she has reason to believe is guilty of immorality,
misconduct in office, incompetency, willful neglect of duty, or nonfeasance.
In the case of a member of a school council or appointed member of a county
board of education, the written charges shall be provided to the local board of
education.
(c)[(2)] The chief state school officer shall recommend by written charges the
suspension by the Kentucky Board of Education of any superintendent of
Page 13 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
schools or other public school officer whom he or she has reason to believe is
guilty of immorality, misconduct in office, incompetency, willful neglect of
duty, or nonfeasance. If the charges brought under this paragraph[subsection]
represent an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare, the
Kentucky Board of Education shall summarily suspend the person against
whom the charges are made. The action by the Kentucky Board of Education
may be taken upon a recommendation of the chief state school officer, or the
action may be taken by a majority vote of the Kentucky Board of Education
without recommendation from the chief state school officer.
(d)[(3)] The Kentucky Board of Education may suspend a district superintendent
of schools or other public school officer under paragraph (c) of this
subsection[subsection (2) of this section] or remove him or her pursuant to
paragraph (f) of this subsection[ (5) of this section] only if, after thirty (30)
days of receipt of the written charges specified in subsection (1) of this
section, the proper school authorities having immediate jurisdiction, either the
superintendent or the district board of education, have refused to act, have
acted in bad faith, arbitrarily, or capriciously, or if a recommendation to the
district board would have been futile.
(e)[(4)] Any officer suspended by the Kentucky Board of Education under
paragraph (c) of this subsection[ (2) of this section] shall be furnished with
an emergency order specifying in detail the reasons for suspension and
notifying the officer of his or her right to appeal the action and have an
emergency hearing pursuant to KRS 13B.125.
(f)[(5)] As an alternative to first seeking suspension, the chief state school
officer may recommend by written charges the removal by the Kentucky
Board of Education of any superintendent of schools or other public school
officer whom he or she has reason to believe is guilty of immorality,
Page 14 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
misconduct in office, incompetency, willful neglect of duty, or nonfeasance.
The officer against whom the written charges are issued by the chief state
school officer shall be furnished with the written charges and notice of
procedural rights conferred under KRS Chapter 13B. Within twenty (20) days
after receipt of the charges, the officer may notify the Kentucky Board of
Education of his or her intention to appear and answer the charges. Upon
appeal, an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B. If the officer fails to notify the board of his or her intention to
appear and answer the charges, the Kentucky Board of Education may remove
the officer by a majority vote, and the dismissal shall be final.
(g)[(6)] The hearing shall be public or private at the discretion of the accused
former or current superintendent and shall be public when testimony is taken
for board members.
(h)[(7)] The Kentucky Board of Education may meet in closed session to
consider the evidence and may by a majority vote remove the officer. If the
board votes to remove the officer, the board shall prepare final order
specifying which charge or charges it found to be the basis for removal. If
within ninety (90) days from the date of suspension if applicable, the state
board has not removed the officer, or has dismissed the charges, the
suspended officer shall be reinstated and shall be paid his or her full salary for
the period of suspension.
(i)[(8)] The officer shall have a right to appeal on the record to the Circuit Court
located in the county of the school district in accordance with KRS Chapter
13B. If the decision of the court is against removal, the officer shall be paid
his or her full salary from the date of suspension. The payment shall be made
from funds appropriated to the State Department of Education.
(j)[(9)] If a superintendent of schools is removed from office or resigns while
Page 15 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
charges are pending pursuant to this section[ after July 15, 1994], any
continuing contract pursuant to KRS 161.720 to 161.810 shall be terminated.
If the removal is reversed upon appeal, the continuing contract shall be
restored and he or she shall be paid his or her full salary for the period of
suspension.
(2) In county school districts having reached an end-of-year enrollment of twenty-
five thousand (25,000) or more students, the chief executive officer of the county
may remove a member of the board of education appointed in accordance with
subsection (5) of Section 1 of this Act for cause, including but not limited to
malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, or gross neglect of duty.
Section 7. KRS 160.240 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The general election laws shall apply to all elections of school board members[.
(2) In school districts embracing designated cities, the expense of the election shall be
paid by the city from its general funds. In all other districts the expense shall be
paid by the fiscal court out of its general funds.
(3) As used in this section, "designated city" has the same meaning as in KRS
160.020].
Section 8. KRS 304.48-250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the assets of a liability self-insurance group are at any time insufficient to enable
the group to discharge its legal liabilities, other obligations, and to maintain the
required reserves under this subtitle, the group shall immediately levy an
assessment upon its members for the amount necessary to make up the deficiency.
(2) If there is a deficiency in any fund year, the deficiency shall be made up
immediately, from the following:
(a) Surplus from a fund year other than the current fund year after prior notice of
the transfer has been given to the commissioner;
(b) Administrative funds;
Page 16 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
(c) Assessment of membership; or
(d) Alternate methods as the commissioner may direct or approve.
(3) If a liability self-insurance group fails to assess its members within thirty (30) days
to make up a deficit, the commissioner shall order it to do so. This subsection shall
not apply to liability self-insurance groups formed by governmental entities which
do not have joint and several liability.
(4) If a liability self-insurance group fails to make the required assessment of its
members within thirty (30) days after the commissioner orders it to do so, or if the
deficiency is not fully made up within sixty (60) days after the date on which the
assessment is made, or within a longer period of time as may be permitted by the
commissioner, the group shall be determined to be insolvent and may be placed in
delinquency proceedings as an insurer pursuant to Subtitle 33 of this chapter.
(5) (a) Governmental entities that:
1. Participate or have participated in a liability self-insurance group
authorized by this subtitle; and
2. Are assessed by the liability self-insurance group to cover an accrued
deficit;
may finance the payment of the assessment over a period not to exceed twenty
(20) years.
(b) Financing obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be
accomplished by:
1. The issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations; or
2. A lease, installment payment agreement, or other similar agreement.
(c) If the governmental entity fails to make a scheduled payment on the financing
obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, any payments due to
that governmental entity shall be withheld or intercepted using the process
established in subsection (7) of Section 2 of this Act[KRS 160.160(6)].
Page 17 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
(6) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes applying to any financing obtained by a governmental
entity shall apply.
Section 9. KRS 304.50-055 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "nationally recognized statistical rating organization" or
"NRSRO" means a credit rating agency approved by the United States Securities
and Exchange Commission to provide assessments of the creditworthiness of
financial instruments.
(2) A workers' compensation self-insured group shall establish plans for premium
payment, determination and collection of assessments, and for declaration and
payment of dividends or other disbursements, which shall be filed for prior
approval with the commissioner. Any change in the plans for premium payment,
assessments, or dividends shall be filed for prior approval with the commissioner.
Approval of plans for assessments and dividends does not constitute approval of
any particular assessment or dividend by the commissioner.
(3) Prior to the inception of each group member's self-insurance year, the trustees shall
collect from that member at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated
premium for the ensuing year, except that in the case of a self-insured group formed
by governmental entities twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated premium for
the ensuing year shall be collected no later than thirty (30) days after the beginning
of the self-insured group's self-insurance year. The balance of the estimated
premium shall be collected in either quarterly or monthly installments as set forth in
the enabling documents described in KRS 304.50-030(2)(b) or 304.50-060(2)(b).
Each group member's payroll shall be audited annually and an adjustment to
premium shall be made accordingly.
(4) A disbursement from a workers' compensation self-insured group fund shall be for
a purpose related to the self-insured group. A dividend shall not be approved or
Page 18 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
paid until at least thirty-six (36) months after the expiration of the self-insurance
year and shall be paid from surplus funds not required for payment of claims or
other liabilities. The dividends shall be paid or credited to members according to the
reasonable classifications the trustees may establish. A dividend shall not be paid
which unfairly discriminates between members of the same classifications. A
dividend plan shall specify whether past group members are eligible for the
dividend. Payment of a dividend under a dividend plan shall not be made unless the
self-insured group has notified the commissioner of its intent to make a dividend
payment at least thirty (30) days prior to the payment, and the commissioner has not
disapproved the payment within that time.
(5) The formula to be used for collection of assessments shall be determined by the
trustees and approved by the commissioner. Assessments shall be fair and equitable
and shall not unfairly discriminate between members of the same classification.
(6) A trustee, fiscal agent, or service organization shall not utilize an asset of the self-
insured group for a purpose unrelated to workers' compensation. The trustees shall
maintain cash or cash equivalent accounts as may be prudently necessary to pay
expenses without having to liquidate long-term investments.
(7) The trustees may invest funds in:
(a) United States Government bonds, United States Treasury notes, Treasury
bills, or other direct obligations guaranteed by the full faith and credit of the
United States Government or its agencies;
(b) Tax exempt and taxable obligations issued by any state or any of its agencies,
counties, cities, municipalities, districts, political subdivisions, or other legal
authorities within the United States of America with a minimum rating of
"BBB" by any NRSRO, except that no less than fifty percent (50%) of the
investments made under this paragraph shall be in obligations issued by the
Commonwealth, its agencies, or a county, city district, municipality, political
Page 19 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
subdivision, or other legal authority within the Commonwealth;
(c) Investment share accounts in a savings and loan association in the
Commonwealth whose deposits are insured by a federal agency;
(d) Certificates of deposit if issued by a duly chartered commercial bank;
(e) 1. At the time of purchase, equity securities actively traded on the New
York or NASDAQ Stock Exchanges or other registered national
securities exchanges with no individual equity holding comprising
greater than ten percent (10%) of the equity portion of the portfolio
reflected on the most recent quarterly or annual statement of financial
condition on file with the commissioner.
2. An investment in an individual equity holding shall not represent at the
time of purchase more than five percent (5%) of the total market value
of the security.
3. At the time of purchase, investments in equity securities shall not exceed
twenty percent (20%) of the total market value of the investment
portfolio of the self-insured group reflected on the most recent quarterly
or annual statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner;
(f) Corporate bonds if:
1. The bond is issued, assumed, or guaranteed by a solvent institution
created or existing under the laws of the United States, or a state,
province, district, or territory;
2. At the time of purchase, the corporate bond investments do not exceed
twenty-five percent (25%) of the total market value of the investment
portfolio reflected on the most recent quarterly or annual statement of
financial condition on file with the commissioner; and
3. The bond has a minimum rating of "BBB" by any NRSRO;
(g) At the time of purchase, mutual funds and exchange traded funds if the
Page 20 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
investments do not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total market value of
the investment portfolio reflected on the most recent quarterly or annual
statement of financial condition on file with the commissioner; and
(h) Asset-backed securities if:
1. The bond is issued, assumed, or guaranteed by a solvent institution
created or existing under the laws of the United States, or a state,
province, district, or territory;
2. The asset-backed security investments do not exceed ten percent (10%)
of the total market value of the investment portfolio reflected on the
most recent quarterly or annual statement of financial condition on file
with the commissioner; and
3. The bond has a minimum rating of "BBB" by any NRSRO.
(8) Of the aggregate investments made by the trustees of the self-insured group under
this section:
(a) Not less than fifty percent (50%) of the total market value of the entire
investment portfolio shall be held in cash, cash equivalents, or securities as
described in subsection (7)(a) to (d) of this section; and
(b) A minimum of five percent (5%) of the total investment portfolio value shall
be maintained in cash or cash equivalent accounts or United States Treasury
and Federal Agency Securities with a remaining maturity of one (1) year or
less.
(9) In the event that any security investment authorized by subsection (7) of this section
is downgraded below "BBB," the workers' compensation self-insurance group shall
divest itself of that investment as prudently as possible without incurring
unnecessary losses.
(10) The commissioner may permit variation from the requirements of this section for
good cause.
Page 21 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
(11) (a) Governmental entities that:
1. Participate or have participated in a workers' compensation self-insured
group authorized by this subtitle; and
2. Are assessed by the workers' compensation self-insured group to cover
an accrued deficit;
may finance the payment of the assessment over a period not to exceed twenty
(20) years.
(b) Financing obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be
accomplished by:
1. The issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations; or
2. A lease, installment payment agreement, or other similar agreement.
(c) If the governmental entity fails to make a scheduled payment on the financing
obtained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, any payments due to
that governmental entity shall be withheld or intercepted using the process
established in subsection (7) of Section 2 of this Act[KRS 160.160(6)].
(12) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, all other provisions of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes applying to any financing obtained by a governmental
entity shall apply.
Section 10. Notwithstanding subsection (5) of Section 1 of this Act and
subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act, a member of the board of education for county
school districts having reached an end-of-year enrollment of twenty-five thousand
(25,000) or more students who has been elected to serve prior to January 1, 2027, shall be
permitted to serve on the county board of education for the remainder of the member's
unexpired term, unless the member resigns or is removed from office pursuant to KRS
415.050 and 415.060.
Section 11. Notwithstanding subsection (5)(d) of Section 1 of this Act, initial
appointments of members to be appointed from the county at large in accordance with
Page 22 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1481
subsection (5)(a) to (c) of Section 1 of this Act to the board of education for county
school districts having reached an end-of-year enrollment of twenty-five thousand
(25,000) or more students shall be as follows:
(1) Two members shall be appointed for a two year term; and
(2) Two members shall be appointed for a four year term.
Section 12. (1) By January 1, 2027, a local board of education that is
required to add membership pursuant to Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall identify the
number of additional positions and the appropriate expiration of the term for each
additional member.
(2) By January 1, 2027, the board of education of each county school district that
is required to add membership pursuant to Section 1 of this Act shall have divided its
district into the required number of divisions containing integral voting precincts and as
equal in population insofar as is practicable. In first dividing the county district into
divisions the board shall, if more than one of its current members reside in one division,
determine by lot which member from that division shall represent that division, and
which members shall represent a division in which no member resides. The members so
determined to represent divisions in which no member resides shall be considered the
members from those divisions until their terms expire, and thereafter the members from
those divisions shall be appointed as provided in Sections 1 of this Act.
(3) By January 1, 2027, the additional positions created that are not represented
by a member shall be filled pursuant to Sections 1 and 2 of this Act.
Section 13. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 23 of 23
XXXX 1/22/2026 9:57 AM Jacketed